Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Section 2 of this 2025 Act is added to and made a part  of ORS 455.410 to
455.740.
SECTION 2. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Alteration” means any construction or renovation  to an existing structure other
than a repair or addition to the existing structure.
(b) “Construction permit” means a building permit or  a permit for electrical work, me-
chanical work or plumbing work in a building.
(c)(A) “Frontage improvement” means  repairs to or construction or renovation of
roadway surfaces, curbs, gutters, sidewalks and similar or related infrastructure that is:
(i) Privately constructed;
(ii) Located within a public right of way; and
(iii) Adjacent to property for which a municipality has issued a construction permit.
(B) “Frontage improvement”  does not include repairing damage that a holder of a con-
struction permit caused.
(2)(a) Except as  provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, a municipality with a pop-
ulation of 15,000 or more may not require in, or as a condition of  obtaining, a construction
permit to renovate or otherwise alter an  existing building that the holder of the construction
permit install a frontage improvement, or have a frontage improvement installed, if:
(A) The alteration does not  result in an increase to the building’s square footage or
footprint;
(B) The cost of the alteration does not exceed the amount  the Director of the Depart-
ment of Consumer and Business Services specifies under subsection (3) of this section; and
(C) Existing or proposed  uses for the building do not result in a change to the occupancy
classification group that applied  to the building at the time the municipality received an ap-
plication for the construction permit.
(b) The prohibition described in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply:
(A) To any of the following conditions a municipality may impose upon a  construction
permit:
(i) A dedication of right-of-way;
(ii) An assessment or required payment of a system development charge;
(iii) A waiver of remonstrance to the formation of a local improvement district; or
Enrolled House Bill 2658 (HB 2658-A) Page 1
(iv) An assessment or collection of fees for a local  improvement district or charges in
lieu of a local improvement district assessment; or
(B) If the Americans  with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq., as in effect
on the effective date of  this 2025 Act, requires the municipality to include the installation
of a frontage improvement as a condition in, or  as a condition of obtaining, a construction
permit.
(3) The director shall set the initial cost that an alteration may not exceed  under sub-
section (2)(a)(B) of this section at $150,000 and each  year shall adjust the cost to reflect
changes in the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West Region  (All Items), as
published by the Bureau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(4) If a municipality or the Department of Transportation requires a person to install  a
frontage improvement along a state highway as a condition in, or a condition  of obtaining,
a construction permit  or obtaining final action on a permit or zone change under ORS 215.427
or 227.175, the municipality and the  department shall coordinate with the person to deter-
mine if design, engineering or  construction plans already exist for the required frontage
improvement.
SECTION 3.  Section 2 of this 2025 Act is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Alteration” means any  construction or renovation to an existing structure other than a
repair or addition to the existing structure.
(b) “Construction permit” means a  building permit or a permit for electrical work, mechanical
work or plumbing work in a building.
(c)(A) “Frontage improvement” means repairs  to or construction or renovation of roadway sur-
faces, curbs, gutters, sidewalks and similar or related infrastructure that is:
(i) Privately constructed;
(ii) Located within a public right of way; and
(iii) Adjacent to property for which a municipality has issued a construction permit.
(B) “Frontage improvement” does not include repairing  damage that a holder of a construction
permit caused.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  a municipality [ with a population
of 15,000 or more ] may not require in, or as a condition of  obtaining, a construction permit to ren-
ovate  or  otherwise alter an existing building that the holder of the construction permit install a
frontage improvement, or have a frontage improvement installed, if:
(A) The alteration does not result in an increase to the building’s square footage or footprint;
(B) The cost of the alteration  does not exceed the amount the Director of the Department of
Consumer and Business Services specifies under subsection (3) of this section; and
(C) Existing or proposed uses for the building do not result in  a change to the occupancy clas-
sification group that applied to  the building at the time the municipality received an application for
the construction permit.
(b) The prohibition described in paragraph (a) of this subsection does not apply:
(A) To any of the following conditions a municipality may impose upon a construction permit:
(i) A dedication of right-of-way;
(ii) An assessment or required payment of a system development charge;
(iii) A waiver of remonstrance to the formation of a local improvement district; or
(iv) An assessment or collection  of fees for a local improvement district or charges in lieu of a
local improvement district assessment; or
(B) If the  Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq., as in effect on the
effective date of this 2025 Act, requires the municipality to  include the installation of a frontage
improvement as a condition in, or as a condition of obtaining, a construction permit.
(3) The director shall set the initial cost  that an alteration may not exceed under subsection
(2)(a)(B) of  this section at $150,000 and each year shall adjust the cost to reflect changes in the
Enrolled House Bill 2658 (HB 2658-A) Page 2
Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers, West  Region (All Items), as published by the Bu-
reau of Labor Statistics of the United States Department of Labor.
(4) If  a municipality or the Department of Transportation requires a person to install a frontage
improvement along a state highway as a condition  in, or a condition of obtaining, a construction
permit or obtaining final action on a permit or zone  change under ORS 215.427 or 227.175, the
municipality and the  department shall coordinate with the person to determine if design, engineering
or construction plans already exist for the required frontage improvement.
SECTION 4. The amendments to section 2 of this 2025 Act by section 3 of this 2025 Act
become operative on January 1, 2031.
Passed by House April 15, 2025
Repassed by House June 24, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2658 (HB 2658-A) Page 3